Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE -
CITIES - CITY MANAGER FORM

31-4-201. Authority to reorganize - rights and powers.

Any city may reorganize into a city council-city manager form of municipal government in accordance with the provisions of this part 2. However, no such city shall have conferred upon it by such reorganization any rights and powers except those rights and powers conferred upon cities by the general laws of this state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1028, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-201 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-202. Petition - election.

When a petition, signed by five percent of the registered electors of the municipality, requesting an election on the question of adopting the city council-city manager form of government is presented to the city council, the city council shall adopt an ordinance calling for an election upon such question to be held within four calendar months from the date of the presentation of such petition. The petition shall state whether the mayor under such form of government shall be elected by and from among the members of the city council or from the city at large by the registered electors of the city at the regular election. The question of adopting such form of government shall be submitted to the registered electors of the city at a special or regular election to be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

The mayor or, in case of the disability of the mayor, the mayor pro tem, immediately following the effective date of such ordinance, shall cause notice to be given of such election, which notice shall be given in the manner prescribed by the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

If the petition requests that the mayor be elected by and from among the members of the city council, the question to be submitted at such election shall be: "Shall the City of (name of city) reorganize by adopting the City Council-City Manager form of government as provided in part 2 of article 4 of title 31, Colorado Revised Statutes, with the mayor to be elected by and from among the members of the city council?". The form of ballot or voting machine tabs shall be: "For City Council-City Manager Form - Mayor elected by Council" and "Against City Council-City Manager Form - Mayor elected by Council".

If the petition requests that the mayor be elected from the city at large by the registered electors of the city at the regular election, the question to be submitted at such election shall be: "Shall the city of (name of city) reorganize by adopting the City Council-City Manager form of government, as provided in part 2 of article 4 of title 31, Colorado Revised Statutes, with the mayor to be elected by the registered electors of the city at the regular election?". The form of ballot or voting machine tabs shall be: "For City Council-City Manager Form - Mayor elected by Popular Vote" and "Against City Council-City Manager Form - Mayor elected by Popular Vote".

The registered electors of any city which has previously reorganized into the city council-city manager form of government under this part 2 may, at any time, petition in the manner set forth in subsection (1) of this section for an election on:

Returning to the original mayor-council form of government;

Retaining the city council-city manager form of government but with the mayor to be elected by the registered electors of the city at the regular election rather than elected by and from among the members of the city council; or

Retaining the city council-city manager form of government but with the mayor to be elected by and from among the members of the city council.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1028, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 327, § 79, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1) and (3) amended and (4) added, p. 1288, § 4, effective April 6.

L. 2021:

(1), (3)(b), and (4)(b) amended, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2422, § 17, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-202 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-4-203. Majority vote carries - when effective.

If a majority of the votes cast are for the proposition, it shall be carried. The form of government existing in such city at the time of such election shall continue unchanged until the next regular election. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the next regular election shall be held for the purpose of electing the officers required by that form of government. Upon the taking of office and compliance with section 31-4-401 by the new officers, the terms of office of existing officers shall terminate, the prior form of government shall cease, and the new form of government shall commence.

If the proposition carried is to return to the original mayor-council form of government, the offices of mayor and other elected offices other than city council members shall be filled at a special election to be held according to the provisions of section 31-4-103; except that such offices shall be filled at the next regular election if such regular election is held less than four months following the adoption of the proposition. Upon the taking of office and compliance with section 31-4-401 by the mayor and other elected officers, the terms of office of existing officers shall terminate, the prior form of government shall cease, and the new form of government shall commence.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1028, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1289, § 5, effective April 6.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1438, § 138, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-203 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-204. Prior laws applicable - rights and liabilities continue.

All laws of the state applicable to the city before the adoption of the city council-city manager form of government and not inconsistent with the provisions of this part 2 shall apply to and govern such reorganized city.

Any bylaw, ordinance, or resolution lawfully passed and in force in such city at the time of its reorganization shall remain in force and continue to be in effect until duly amended or repealed.

The territorial limits of such city shall remain the same as under its former organization.

All rights of whatever description which were vested in such city under its former organization shall be vested in the city after reorganization.

No valid and legally subsisting right or liability either in favor of or against the city and no judicial proceedings, civil or criminal, shall be affected by such change of government unless otherwise provided in this part 2.

No change in the form of government as provided in this part 2, either by adopting or abandoning the form of government as provided in this part 2, shall release or affect any debts, bonds, warrants, or other obligations, however evidenced, which shall continue as valid obligations of the city under the succeeding form of government.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1028, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-3-204 and 31-3-222 as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

31-4-205. Council members - vacancies.

The legislative and corporate authority of cities organized under this part 2 shall be vested in the city council members nominated and elected, two from each ward and one from the city at large, for a term of two years. Members of the city council shall be registered electors of the city who have resided in their respective wards for a period of at least twelve consecutive months immediately preceding the election; except that, in case the boundaries of the ward are changed pursuant to section 31-2-104 or 31-4-104 or as a result of annexation, any person who has resided within territory added to the ward for the time prescribed in this subsection (1) shall be deemed to have met the residence requirements for the ward to which the territory was added.

Within sixty days after a vacancy occurs in the city council, the council shall:

Appoint a person possessed of all statutory qualifications to fill the vacancy until the term of office of a successor elected at the next regular election has commenced as provided in section 31-4-105; or

Order an election, subject to the municipal election code, to be held as soon as practicable to fill the vacancy until the term of office of a successor elected at the next regular election has commenced as provided in section 31-4-105.

The city council may provide by ordinance for four-year overlapping terms of office for its members. The city council may reinstate the two-year terms provided in this section by ordinance. Any ordinance passed pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be enacted at least one hundred eighty days before the next regular election and shall be subject, notwithstanding any emergency declaration, to referendum if such is brought pursuant to section 31-11-105 or pursuant to an applicable municipal ordinance enacted in accordance with section 1 of article V of the state constitution. No ordinance enacted pursuant to this subsection (3) shall extend or reduce the term for which any person was elected. Where four-year terms have been provided for council members pursuant to section 31-4-107 (3), council members shall continue to serve four-year terms unless two-year terms are reinstated pursuant to this subsection (3). If any vacancy occurs in the office of council member for which a four-year term is in effect pursuant to this subsection (3), the vacancy shall be filled as provided in subsection (2) of this section. If the office in which the vacancy occurs is not an office for which a successor would otherwise have been elected at the next regular election, the term of office of the successor elected at that regular election shall be shortened so that the following regular election for the office is held at the time at which it would have been held if no vacancy had occurred.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1029, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1173, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) and (3) amended and (2) R&RE, pp. 1255, 1256, §§ 6, 7, effective July 1.

L. 88:

IP(2) amended, p. 1125, § 5, effective April 4.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 698, § 6, effective May 4.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 441, § 27, effective May 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-205 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-206. Council members - nomination - election - compensation.

The nomination and election of candidates for the city council provided for by this part 2 shall be in accordance with the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

The members of the city council shall receive such compensation as may be fixed by ordinance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1029, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-206 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-4-207. Mayor - selection.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, if the mayor is to be elected by and from among the members of the city council, then at the meeting of the city council at which their terms commence, as provided in section 31-4-105, the city council shall choose, by a majority vote, for a term of two years, one of its members as chairperson, who shall have the title of mayor, and shall also choose, by a majority vote, for a term of two years, one of its members as vice-chairperson, who shall act as mayor pro tem. In case of a vacancy in the office of the mayor, the city council shall choose a successor for the unexpired term.

If the mayor is to be elected from the city at large, he or she shall be elected by the registered electors of the city at the regular election in the city. The mayor shall be a registered elector who has resided within the limits of the city for a period of at least twelve consecutive months immediately preceding the date of the election; except that, in the case of annexation, any person who has resided within the annexed territory for the time prescribed in this subsection (2) shall be deemed to have met the residence requirements for the city to which the territory was annexed. The mayor shall assume his or her office at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the city council following his or her election or upon such earlier date as the council may specify. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the mayor shall hold his or her office for a term of two years. At the same meeting of the city council, the city council shall choose, by a majority vote, one of its members to act as mayor pro tem in the temporary absence of the mayor. The city council may appoint one of its members acting mayor in the event both the mayor and the mayor pro tem are temporarily absent from the city or unable to perform the duties of the mayor. In case of a vacancy in the office of the mayor, the city council shall choose his successor for the unexpired term.

The city council may provide, by ordinance, four-year terms for the office of the mayor. The city council may reinstate two-year terms provided in this section by ordinance. Any ordinance passed pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be enacted at least one hundred eighty days before the next regular election and shall be subject, notwithstanding any emergency declaration, to referendum brought pursuant to section 31-11-105 or pursuant to an applicable ordinance enacted in accordance with section 1 of article V of the state constitution. No ordinance enacted pursuant to this subsection (3) shall extend or reduce the term for which any person was elected. If a vacancy occurs in the office of the mayor for which a four-year term is in effect pursuant to this subsection (3), the vacancy shall be filled as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1030, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1256, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1289, § 6, effective April 6.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 745, § 12, effective April 4.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1192, § 92, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 308, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2423, § 18, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-207 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-207.5. Mayor - powers and duties.

The mayor shall be the presiding officer of the city council and shall have the same voting powers as any member of said council. The mayor shall be considered a member of the governing body and the city council and shall be recognized as the head of the city government for all ceremonial purposes, by the courts for serving civil processes, and by the government for purposes of military law. In addition, the mayor shall exercise such other powers and perform such other duties as are conferred and imposed upon him by this part 2 or the ordinances of the city.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1290, § 7, effective April 6.

31-4-208. City attorney - municipal judge.

The city council shall appoint a city attorney, who, upon taking office, shall be an attorney-at-law licensed to practice in the state of Colorado. The city council shall also appoint a municipal judge in accordance with section 13-10-105 (1), C.R.S. The city attorney shall serve at the pleasure of the city council. A municipal judge may be removed during his term of office only for cause, as provided in section 13-10-105 (2), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1030, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 794, § 6, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-208 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-209. Rules - business - journal.

The city council shall determine its own rules, procedure, and order of business and shall keep a journal of its proceedings. It may compel attendance of members and may punish members for misconduct.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1030, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1174, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-209 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-210. City manager - qualifications - removal.

The city council shall appoint a city manager who shall be the chief administrative officer of the city. The city manager shall be chosen solely on the basis of his executive and administrative qualifications and need not, when appointed, be a resident of the city or of the state. No member of the city council shall be chosen as city manager during his term of office. The city manager shall be appointed for an indefinite term, but he may be removed at the pleasure of the city council for cause. Before the city manager may be removed, he shall be given, if he so demands, a written statement of the reasons alleged for his removal and he has the right to be heard thereon at a public meeting of the council prior to the final vote on the question of his removal. Pending and during such hearing, the city council may suspend him from office. The action of the city council in suspending or removing the city manager shall be final. It is the intent of this part 2 to vest all authority and to fix all responsibility for such suspension or removal in the city council. In case of the absence or disability of the city manager, the city council may designate some qualified person to perform the duties of the office during such absence or disability.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1030, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-210 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-211. City manager - powers and responsibility.

The city manager is responsible to the city council for the proper administration of all affairs of the city placed in his charge and, to that end and except as otherwise provided in this part 2, he shall have the power to appoint and remove all officers and employees in the administrative service of the city except the city attorney and the municipal judge. Appointments made by the city manager shall be on the basis of executive and administrative ability, training, and experience of such appointees in the work which they are to perform. All such appointments shall be without definite term.

Officers and employees appointed by the city manager may be removed by him at any time for cause. The decision of the city manager in any such case shall be final.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1030, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-211 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-212. Council not to interfere.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 2, neither the city council nor any of its committees or members shall direct or request the appointment of any person to or his removal from office by the city manager or in any other manner take part in the appointment or removal of officers and employees in the administrative service of the city. The city council and its members shall deal with that portion of the administrative service for which the city manager is responsible solely through the city manager, and neither the city council nor any member thereof shall give orders to any subordinate of the city, either publicly or privately. Any violation of the provisions of this section by a member of the city council constitutes misconduct and is punishable in such manner as may be determined by the other members of the city council.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1031, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-212 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-213. Duties of city manager.

It is the duty of the city manager to act as chief conservator of the peace within the city; to supervise the administration of the affairs of the city; to see that the ordinances of the city and the applicable laws of the state are enforced; to make such recommendations to the city council concerning the affairs of the city as seem desirable to him; to keep the city council advised of the financial conditions and future needs of the city; to prepare and submit to the city council the annual budget estimate; to prepare and submit to the city council such reports as are required by that body; to prepare and submit each month to the city council a detailed report covering all activities of the city, including a summary statement of revenues and expenditures for the preceding month, detailed as to appropriations and funds in such a manner as to show the exact financial condition of the city and of each department and division thereof as of the last day of the previous month; and to perform such other duties as may be prescribed by this part 2 or required of him by ordinance or resolution of the city council.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1031, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-213 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-214. City manager sits in council - no vote.

The city manager is entitled to a seat in the city council but shall have no vote therein. The city manager has the right to take part in the discussion of all matters coming before the city council.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1031, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-214 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-215. Administrative plan.

The city council, upon the report and recommendation of the city manager, has the power to create and establish by ordinance administrative departments of city administration. It is the duty of the city manager to propose a plan of administrative organization to the city council within sixty days after his appointment which, if approved by the city council, shall be adopted by ordinance. The administrative plan shall provide for the establishment of the office of city clerk. The city clerk shall be ex officio city treasurer and clerk of the city council. Subject to the supervision and control of the city manager in all matters, the city clerk shall keep and supervise all accounts and have custody of all public moneys of the city; apportion and collect special assessments; issue licenses; collect license fees; make and keep a journal of proceedings of the city council; have custody of all public records of the city not specifically entrusted to any other office; and perform such other duties pertaining to such offices as are by ordinance required or assigned to him by the city manager. The administrative plan shall also provide for a chief of police, a fire chief, a health officer, and such other officers as are deemed necessary for the efficient administration of the city, and such plan may or may not include, in the discretion of the city council, all of the officers named in sections 31-4-105 and 31-4-107. All such officers shall be appointed by the city manager as provided in section 31-4-211. This plan of the city manager shall be placed on file and shall be a matter of public record open to the examination and inspection of the public at all reasonable times. The city council, upon recommendation of the city manager, may change or abolish, by ordinance, any department or office established by ordinance, prescribe, distribute, or discontinue the functions and duties of departments and offices so established, or assign additional functions and duties to departments and offices.

All administrative boards, departments, or offices existing in any city prior to its reorganization shall continue to exist after its reorganization under this part 2 until abolished, altered, or reorganized by ordinance of the city council.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1031, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-215 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-216. Accounts of utilities.

Accounts shall be kept for each public utility owned or operated by the city, distinct from other city accounts, and in such manner as to show the true and complete financial result of such city ownership and operation including all assets, liabilities, revenues, and expenses, and in accordance with the uniform classification of accounts as may be prescribed by the public utilities commission of this state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1032, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-216 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-217. Publicity of records.

Records of the city shall be open to inspection at reasonable times and under reasonable regulations established by the city as provided by article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1032, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 745, § 13, effective April 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-217 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-218. Pay of officers and employees.

The salary or compensation of officers and employees shall be established by ordinance, which shall provide uniform compensation for like services. Such schedules of compensation may fix the minimum and maximum for any grade. An increase in compensation, within the limits provided for the grade, may be granted at any time by the city manager or other appointing authority upon the basis of efficiency and seniority.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1032, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-218 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-219. Official bonds - waiver.

The city manager, the city clerk, and such other officers and employees as the city council may require so to do shall give bonds in such amounts and with such sureties as may be approved by the city council. The premiums on such bonds shall be paid by the city. The city council may waive the requirement of such bonds.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1032, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1290, § 8, effective April 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-219 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-220. Abandonment of form of government. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1032, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 327, § 80, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section repealed, p. 1293, § 18, effective April 6.

Editor's note:

Before its repeal, this section was similar to former § 31-3-220 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-221. Effective date of change. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1033, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1256, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section repealed, p. 1293, § 18, effective April 6.

Editor's note:

Before its repeal, this section was similar to former § 31-3-221 as it existed prior to 1975.